Washington statutes.
RCW 10.97.100

Fees.

Criminal justice agencies shall be authorized to establish and collect reasonable fees for the dissemination of criminal history record information to agencies and persons other than criminal justice agencies.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 314 s 10.]